Utah statutes.
9-4-1105.   Executive director.

(1) (a)  The board shall:

(i)  hire an executive director for the corporation as provided in this subsection;

(ii)  conduct a national search to find applicants for the position of executive director;

(iii) establish the salary, benefits, and other compensation of the executive director.

(b)  The board may appoint an interim director while searching for a permanent executive director.

(c)  The executive director serves at the pleasure of the board and may be terminated by the board at will.

(d)  The executive director is an employee of the corporation.

(e)  The executive director may not be a member of the board.

(2)  The executive director shall:

(a)  act as the executive officer of the board and the corporation;

(b)  administer, manage, and direct the affairs and activities of the corporation in accordance with the policies and under the control and direction of the board;

(c)  keep the board, the governor, the Legislature, and its agencies, and other affected officers, associations, and groups informed about the operations of the corporation;

(d)  recommend to the board any necessary or desirable changes in the statutes governing the corporation;

(e)   recommend to the board an annual administrative budget covering the operations of the corporation and, upon approval, submit the budget to the governor and the Legislature for their examination and approval;

(f)  after approval, direct and control the subsequent expenditures of the budget;

(g)  employ, within the limitations of the budget, staff personnel and consultants to accomplish the purpose of the corporation, and establish their qualifications, duties, and compensation;

(h)  keep in convenient form all records and accounts of the corporation, including those necessary for the administration of the state fair;

(i)  in cooperation with the board, create:

(i)  business plans for the corporation;

(ii)  a financial plan for the corporation that projects self-sufficiency for the corporation within two years; and

(iii)  a master plan for the state fair park;

(j)  approve all accounts for:

(i)  salaries;

(ii)  allowable expenses of the corporation and its employees and consultants;

(iii)  expenses incidental to the operation of the corporation; and

(k)  perform other duties as directed by the board.

